Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Endangered Species.

Sec. 16.20.180.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature recognizes that, due to growth and development, certain species or subspecies of fish and wildlife are now and may in the future be threatened with extinction.
The purpose of AS

16.20.180

—

16.20.210

is to establish a program for their continued conservation, protection, restoration, and propagation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1971)

Sec. 16.20.185.
Protection of habitat.

On land under their respective jurisdictions, the commissioner of fish and game and the commissioner of natural resources shall take measures to preserve the natural habitat of species or subspecies of fish and wildlife that are recognized as threatened with extinction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1971)

Sec. 16.20.190.
Determining endangered species.

A species or subspecies of fish or wildlife is considered endangered when the commissioner of fish and game determines that its numbers have decreased to such an extent as to indicate that its continued existence is threatened. In making this determination the commissioner of fish and game shall consider

the destruction, drastic modification, or severe curtailment of its habitat;

its overutilization for commercial or sporting purposes;

the effect on it of disease or predation;

other natural or man-made factors affecting its continued existence.

After making a determination under (a) of this section, the commissioner of fish and game shall, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), publish a list of the species or subspecies of fish and wildlife that are endangered. The commissioner shall, at least once every two years thereafter, conduct a thorough review of the list to determine what changes have occurred concerning the species or subspecies listed. Consideration of existing species or subspecies of fish and wildlife for listing under this section shall be made on a continuing basis. The review of listed species or subspecies conducted under this section shall be submitted in writing to the governor and the legislature and shall be made available to the public.

In making the determination and review under (a) and (b) of this section, the commissioner of fish and game shall seek the advice and recommendation of interested persons and organizations, including but not limited to ornithologists, ichthyologists, ecologists, and zoologists.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1971)

Sec. 16.20.195.
Permit for taking endangered species.

A species or subspecies of fish or wildlife listed as endangered under AS

16.20.190(b)

may not be harvested, captured, or propagated except under the terms of a special permit issued by the commissioner of fish and game for scientific or educational purposes, or for propagation in captivity for the purpose of preservation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1971)

Sec. 16.20.200.
Penalty.

A person who, without a permit issued under AS

16.20.195

, harvests, injures, imports, exports, or captures a species or subspecies of fish or wildlife listed under AS

16.20.190

, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1971)

Cross references. —

For punishment of misdemeanors, see
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 16.20.210.
Birds included.

In AS

16.20.180

—

16.20.210

, “fish or wildlife” includes birds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1971)

Cross references. —

For further definitions, see AS

16.05.940

.

Sec. 16.20.220.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.500.]

Sec. 16.20.230.
[Renumbered (a)(1) as AS 16.20.550, (a)(2) as AS 16.20.555, (a)(3) as AS 16.20.560, (a)(4) as AS 16.20.565, (a)(5) as AS 16.20.570, (a)(6) as AS 16.20.575, (a)(7) as AS 16.20.580, (a)(8) as AS 16.20.585, (a)(9) as AS 16.20.590, (a)(10) as AS 16.20.595, (a)(11) as AS 16.20.600, (a)(12), (b), (c), and (d) as AS 16.20.605.]

Secs. 16.20.240 — 16.20.260.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.510 — 16.20.530.]

Sec. 16.20.270.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.690.]